Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Chapter 17

City Courts In Home Rule Municipalities

16-17-101. Establishment of city courts.

In each home rule municipality that does not have a city court ordained and established by the general assembly, a city court is created to try violations of municipal ordinances. The governing body of the municipality may increase the number of divisions of the court created by this subsection (a).

The governing bodies of all home-rule municipalities may also decrease the number of divisions of city courts by ordinance, but no division shall be eliminated except when a term of a city court judge expires or when a vacancy in the office of city court judge exists.

[Deleted by 2019 amendment.]

Acts 1972, ch. 778, § 1; T.C.A., § 16-1201; Acts 1994, ch. 712, § 1; 2003, ch. 113, § 2; 2009, ch. 128, § 1; 2019, ch. 420, § 11.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment rewrote (a) which read: “(a) In all home rule municipalities, the governing bodies are authorized to establish city courts to try violations of municipal ordinances, and in those municipalities which now have city courts, the governing bodies may increase the number of divisions of same.”

The 2019 amendment deleted former (c), which read: “Notwithstanding this section or any other provision of the law to the contrary, no municipality shall create a municipal court with concurrent general sessions court jurisdiction from May 12, 2003, until such time as the Tennessee judicial council, having heard the report of the committee it created to examine the issue of the proliferation of municipal courts in the state, has made a recommendation to the general assembly and the general assembly has had until the adjournment of the first session of the 103rd General Assembly to consider the issue and determine whether any legislative changes are necessary. During the second session of the 103rd General Assembly, and thereafter, any legislation on the subject of municipal courts with concurrent general sessions court jurisdiction may be considered and enacted.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 128, § 4. May 5, 2009.

Acts 2019, ch. 420, § 27. May 21, 2019.

Cross-References. Home rule, Tenn. Const., art. XI, § 9.

Places where supreme court to hold court, Tenn. Const., art. VI, § 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 26.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Municipal Courts (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 431.

Attorney General Opinions. The term “general sessions court” cannot accurately refer to a city court, OAG 01-160 (10/25/01).

Comparative Legislation. Municipal courts:

Ala. Code § 12-14-1 et seq.

Ark. Code § 16-17-201 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 36-32-1 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. § 21-23-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 478.230.

Va. Code § 16.1-69.1 et seq.

16-17-102. Judges — Appointment and election.

The judge of the city court shall be appointed on the nomination of the mayor and concurred in by the city council or other legislative body, but the appointed judge shall serve only until the next general election, at which time a judge or judges will be elected.

Acts 1972, ch. 778, § 2; modified; T.C.A., § 16-1202; Acts 2009, ch. 128, § 2.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment rewrote the section which read: “The judges of the city court hereinafter established by the governing body of home rule municipalities shall be appointed on the nomination of the mayor or chief executive officer, concurred in by the city council or other legislative body, but the judges so appointed shall run for election in the next general election.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 128, § 4. May 5, 2009.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Municipal Courts (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 431.

Attorney General Opinions. A former city judge was not entitled to salary or benefits, including payment by the city for COBRA coverage, after the successor assumed office where the judge was originally elected to a term that would have ended in April 2001, but the law mandating the election time for city judge was changed after the judge took office, and the judge's successor took office on September 1, 2000, OAG 01-006 (1/10/01).

T.C.A. § 16-17-102 applies only to a court newly created under the authority of the section, but not to additional divisions added to an existing court under the section, OAG 01-153 (10/1/01).

Assuming that current city judges were selected by a city commission, they were not appointed as required under the statute as the statute requires that interim city judges must be nominated by the mayor with the concurrence of the city commission, OAG 01-153 (10/1/01).

16-17-103. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 16-17-103 (Acts 1972, ch. 778, § 3; T.C.A., § 16-1203), concerning power and authority of judges, was repealed by Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 6(e), effective March 1, 2005.

16-17-104. Increase of divisions — Powers.

In those home rule municipalities that have city courts and whose divisions have been increased by the legislative body, the new divisions have the same power as other divisions and are under the same direction and control as provided in this part and the municipality's charter.

Acts 1972, ch. 778, § 4; T.C.A., § 16-1204; Acts 2009, ch. 128, § 3.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment rewrote the section which read: “In those home rule cities which have city courts and in which the legislative body increases the number of divisions thereof, the legislative body shall authorize the same power as other divisions, and the newly created divisions shall be under the same direction and control as presently provided in the municipal charter.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 128, § 4. May 5, 2009.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Municipal Courts (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 431.

16-17-105. Costs — Limitation.

Municipal court costs shall be set and collected in accordance with § 16-18-304, and the litigation tax shall be levied and collected in accordance with § 16-18-305.

Acts 1972, ch. 778, § 5; T.C.A., § 16-1205; Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 6(e)(2).

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 914, § 8(b) provided that, notwithstanding any provision of former § 16-17-101(c), or any other law to the contrary, from May 12, 2003, through March 1, 2005, concurrent general sessions jurisdiction shall not be newly conferred upon any existing or newly created municipal court.

Cross-References. Fees collectible by general sessions court clerks, § 8-21-401.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Municipal Courts (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 431.